src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Misc2PreBase
+Quant+Only:djal^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 4+36132336041594" ;
+Quant+CloseUp:darnh^ GINPreBase  "weight: 8.762669736950471" ;
+Quant+Small:yaw^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 6.950909601015748" ;
+Quant+Each:bebbeh^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 6.735718377892033" ;             ! bebbeh
+Quant+Many:mirnde^ AspPreBase2  "weight: 6.9608599318689155" ;             ! many
0:0 GINPreBase ;

LEXICON AspPreBase2
+Imm:h^ GINPreBase  "weight: 4+334743113529392" ;
0:0 GINPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   INCORPORATED +NS                !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON GINPreBase
+Gin:0 +NBase  "weight: 3.424549076399586" ;
0 BPINPreBase ;

LEXICON BPINPreBase ! names also fall into this category: any attributes of the person.
+Bpin:balem^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:bard^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:berd^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:berl^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:berre^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:bodme^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:bid^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:bininj^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:dad^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:dang^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:dedj^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:denge^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:rrenge^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:dile^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:djen^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;                                          ! tongue
+Bpin:djikka^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:kanem^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:keb^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:kodj^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:kom^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:kord^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:kuk^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:kurlah^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:kurlh^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:milh^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:mim^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:murrng^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:njam^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:nuk^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
+Bpin:rrulkki^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;                                    ! internal.sick
+Bpin:yidme^ AdjPreBase  "weight: 4.704842474691205" ;
0:0 SPAPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   POST-NOMINAL SLOTS                !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON AdjPreBase
+A+Tight:djokko^ SPAPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
+A+Big:kimuk^ SPAPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
+Quant+Many:wern^ SPAPreBase  "weight: 6.9608599318689155" ;
0:0 SPAPreBase ;

LEXICON SPAPreBase
0:0 COMPreBase ;    ! Spatial slot in Evans' grammar had no examples in Kunwinjku, so this is a pass-through for now

LEXICON COMPreBase
0:0 VerbValencyCheck ;
@P.VALENCE.AUGM@+Com:@P.VALENCE.AUGM@yi^ VerbValencyCheck  "weight: 4.568205641786002" ;

LEXICON VerbValencyCheck
@R.VALENCE.AUGM@ AllVerbs ;
@R.VALENCE.INTR@ IntransitiveVerbs ;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@ TransitiveVerbs ; 





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   TAM INFLECTION, VERB POST-BASE    !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON anyVerbPostBase
0:0 V1PostBase ;
0:0 V2PostBase ;
0:0 V3aPostBase ;
0:0 V3bPostBase ;
0:0 V3cPostBase ;
0:0 V3dPostBase ;
0:0 V4aPostBase ;
0:0 V4bPostBase ;
0:0 V5aPostBase ;
0:0 V5bPostBase ;
0:0 V5cPostBase ;
0:0 V6aPostBase ;
0:0 V7aPostBase ;
0:0 V8PostBase ;
0:0 V9PostBase ;
0:0 V10PostBase ;
0:0 V11PostBase ;
0:0 ReVerbs ;
0:0 NonverbalPostBase ;

LEXICON V1PostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:~iyindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;   
0:0 V1Conj ;

LEXICON V1Conj
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@~i^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:n^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:+ninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
+Irr:ninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V2PostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:~indi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V2Conj ;

LEXICON V2Conj
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:men^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:meninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3aPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V3aConj ;

LEXICON V3aConj
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@0^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3bPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3cPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@ng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3dPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V3dConj ;

LEXICON V3dConj
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V3IrrPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@neng^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V4aPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:yind^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V4aConj ;

LEXICON V4aConj
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@m^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@~om^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
