src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
bukme:bukme^ V3dPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! dry up
burlurlhme:burlurlhme^ V1PostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                             ! Swell up
djudme:djudme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! stick in
dolka:(rr)olka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                            ! get up
gerremadbu:gerremadbu^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                     ! wait for something to cook
kawo:kawo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! disturb
kewkme:kewkme^ V1PostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
kombukdowe:kombukdowe^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kuwa:kuwa^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
manka:manka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                              ! fall, land
menmenyime:menmenyime^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngomka:ngomka^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! swim 
ngu:ngu^ V3IrrPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! eat (intrans)
njudjme:njudme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     !
wokna:wokna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! speak, talk, make sound
woybukwo:woybukwo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
yawa:yawa^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! seek
yerrka:yerrka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! sit
yerrkme:yerrkme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
barlke:barlke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! fill
bidbuyhwe:bidbuyhwe^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
birrka:birrka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bolkbawo:bolkbawo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bolkna:bolkna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
borna:borna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dabke:dabke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djangka:djangka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! hunt
djorrngme:djorrngme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djowkke:djowkke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! cross over
duhke:duhke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
gerremadbu:gerremadbu^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                ! wait for something to cook
ka:ka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                        ! take, carry along
kebngu:kebngu^ V3IrrPostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
kukwarrewo:kukwarrewo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kurduna:kurduna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
manjngu:manjngu^ V3IrrPostBase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
marnbu:marnbu^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! make, build, do, complete, fix, heal, organize, arrange
nahnan:nahna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! look after, care for
ngehke:ngehke^ V2PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngu:ngu^ V3IrrPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! eat (something)
ngunjdjikka:ngunjdjikka^ V3aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
rawo:rawo^ V3dPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! combine, mix, add
warlbu:warlbu^ V4aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! hunt, gather
warrewo:warrewo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! ruin, damage
werrhme:werrhme^ V1PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
widnan:widna^ V3bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! hate, dislike
yakwo:yakwo^ V3cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                  ! finish
